Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 10

Acupuncture

63-6-1001. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“ACAOM” means the Accreditation Commission for Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine;

“Acupuncture” means a form of health care developed from traditional and modern oriental medical concepts that employs oriental medical diagnosis and treatment and adjunctive therapies and diagnostic techniques for the promotion, maintenance and restoration of health and the prevention of disease;

“ADS” means an acupuncture detoxification specialist trained in, and who performs only, the five-point auricular detoxification treatment;

“Board” means the Tennessee board of medical examiners;

“NADA” means the National Acupuncture Detoxification Association;

“NCCAOM” means the National Certification Commission for Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine; and

“Practice of acupuncture” means the insertion of acupuncture needles and the application of moxibustion to specific areas of the human body based on oriental medical diagnosis as a primary mode of therapy. Adjunctive therapies within the scope of acupuncture may include acupressure, cupping, thermal and electrical treatment and the recommendation of dietary guidelines and supplements and therapeutic exercise based on traditional oriental medical concepts.

Acts 2000, ch. 685, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 685, § 1 provided that the purpose of the act is to promote the health, safety and welfare of the people of Tennessee by establishing an orderly system of acupuncture certification and to provide a valid, effective means of establishing certification requirements without undue financial burden to the people of Tennessee through the use of a national certifying commission that has been established to certify the competency of acupuncturists.

Acts 2000, ch. 685, § 14 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that certification of acupuncturists under this board shall cease and terminate on June 30, 2002. After June 30, 2002, the board shall issue licenses to those acupuncturists who are certified upon such date who meet the qualifications set out in this act. Certification is intended to be a temporary measure and shall expire as licensure of acupuncturists is implemented.

Attorney General Opinions. Chiropractors may not practice a treatment modality that involves the insertion of needles with the intent bring about the same result as the needle insertion techniques applied in the practice of acupuncture, without first obtaining a certification to practice acupuncture, OAG 05-020, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (3/08/05).

63-6-1002. Application.

This part shall not apply to:

Physicians licensed under this chapter or chapter 9 of this title, nor shall this part be construed so as to prevent the practice of acupuncture by such physicians or to prevent such physicians from using the title “acupuncturist”;

Registered nurses who are nationally certified as holistic nurses and who have successfully completed an accredited education program in acupuncture; or

Chiropractic physicians licensed under chapter 4 of this title, nor shall any part of this title be construed so as to prevent the practice of acupuncture by chiropractic physicians who have completed two hundred fifty (250) hours of an accredited acupuncture course and have passed the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners acupuncture exam.

It is otherwise unlawful to practice acupuncture for compensation or gratuitously unless certified under this part. This restriction does not apply to the following:

Students practicing acupuncture under the supervision of a certified acupuncturist as part of a course of study approved by the committee; or

Individuals who do not otherwise possess the credentials required for the practice of acupuncture by this part or regulations promulgated hereunder by the board are granted limited certification as an ADS for the purpose of the treatment of alcoholism, substance abuse or chemical dependency if they meet the following conditions:

Provide documentation of successful completion of a board-approved training program in auricular detoxification acupuncture that meets or exceeds standards of training set by NADA;

Practice auricular detoxification treatment in a hospital, clinic or treatment facility that provides comprehensive alcohol and substance abuse or chemical dependency services, including counseling, under the supervision of a certified acupuncturist or medical director;

Satisfy all appropriate ethical standards specified in § 63-6-1007; and

Limit their practice to the five-point auricular detoxification treatment.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor. A person who violates this section shall also be subject to the sanctions specified in § 63-6-1007.

Acts 2000, ch. 685, § 4; 2006, ch. 775, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-6-1003. Tennessee advisory committee for acupuncture.

To assist the board in the performance of its duties, there is hereby established the Tennessee advisory committee for acupuncture.

The committee shall consist of five (5) members appointed by the governor. Three (3) of the members shall be certified acupuncturists, one (1) shall be an ADS practicing in Tennessee and one (1) shall be a consumer member who is neither employed in nor has any other direct or indirect affiliation with the health care profession or industry. The three (3) acupuncturists initially appointed need not be certified at the time of their appointments, but must meet all the qualifications for certification.

Notwithstanding § 3-6-304 or any other law to the contrary, and in addition to all other requirements for membership on the committee:

Any person registered as a lobbyist pursuant to the registration requirements of title 3, chapter 6 who is subsequently appointed or otherwise named as a member of the committee shall terminate all employment and business association as a lobbyist with any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the committee, prior to serving as a member of the committee. This subdivision (c)(1)(A) shall apply to all persons appointed or otherwise named to the committee after July 1, 2010;

No person who is a member of the committee shall be permitted to register or otherwise serve as a lobbyist pursuant to title 3, chapter 6 for any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the committee during such person's period of service as a member of the committee. This subdivision (c)(1)(B) shall apply to all persons appointed or otherwise named to the committee after July 1, 2010, and to all persons serving on the committee on such date who are not registered as lobbyists; and

No person who serves as a member of the committee shall be employed as a lobbyist by any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the committee for one (1) year following the date such person's service on the committee ends. This subdivision (c)(1)(C) shall apply to persons serving on the committee as of July 1, 2010, and to persons appointed to the committee subsequent to such date.

A person who violates this subsection (c) shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in title 3, chapter 6.

The bureau of ethics and campaign finance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this subsection (c). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and in accordance with the procedure for initiating and proposing rules by the ethics commission to the bureau of ethics and campaign finance as prescribed in § 4-55-103.

In addition to all other requirements for membership on the committee, all persons appointed or otherwise named to serve as members of the committee after July 1, 2010, shall be residents of this state.

Of the initial appointments to the committee, two (2) members shall be appointed for terms of three (3) years, two (2) members shall be appointed for terms of two (2) years and one (1) member shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year. All regular appointments thereafter shall be for terms of four (4) years. No person may serve more than two (2) consecutive full terms as a member of the committee. Each member shall serve on the committee until a successor is appointed. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment of the governor for the unexpired term.

At the committee's first meeting each year after any new members have been appointed, the members shall choose one (1) member to chair the committee for the year and another to serve as co-chair. No person shall chair the committee for more than five (5) consecutive years.

The committee shall meet at least once each year within forty-five (45) days after the appointment of the new members. The committee shall meet at other times as needed to perform its duties.

Any member who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year shall be removed as a member of the committee.

The committee's chair shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the appointing authority of any member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (g)(2)(A).

Each member shall receive all necessary expenses incident to conducting the business of the committee and, in addition thereto, shall be entitled to a per diem of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day's service in conducting the business of the committee. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The committee shall receive from the division of health related boards of the department of health all administrative, investigatory and clerical services as provided for in § 63-1-101. Committee expenses shall be paid from funds generated by certification fees generated by acupuncturists and acupuncture detoxification specialists.

Acts 2000, ch. 685, § 5; 2010, ch. 995, §§ 3, 4; 2016, ch. 616, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee advisory committee for acupuncture, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

Acts 2010, ch. 995, § 5 provided that the provision in the act prohibiting a consumer with any other direct or indirect affiliation with the health care profession or industry from serving on the committee shall apply to all consumer member appointments made to the committee after July 1, 2010.

63-6-1004. Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The board, in consultation with the committee, shall:

Establish the qualifications and fitness of applicants of certifications, renewal of certifications and reciprocal certifications;

Establish grounds for revocation, suspension or denial of certification;

Establish grounds for placing on probation a holder of a certificate;

Establish the categories of fees and the amount of fees that may be imposed in connection with certification;

Issue declaratory orders pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5;

If deemed necessary by the committee, establish standards of continuing education; and

Adopt and use a seal to authenticate official documents of the committee.

Any actions taken under this section shall only be effective after adoption of a majority vote of the members of the committee. The board, by a majority vote of its members at the next board meeting at which administrative matters are considered, may rescind any action taken by the committee.

Acts 2000, ch. 685, § 6.

63-6-1005. Certification to practice.

To receive certification to practice acupuncture from the board, a person must document:

Either:

Current active status as a diplomate in acupuncture of the NCCAOM; or

Current state licensure in good standing by another state with substantially equivalent or higher standards;

Successful completion of a three-year post secondary training program or acupuncture college program that is ACAOM accredited or in candidacy status or that meets ACAOM's standards; and

Successful completion of a NCCAOM-approved clean needle technique course.

The committee shall waive the requirements of subsection (a) for an applicant residing in Tennessee upon July 1, 2001, who presents satisfactory evidence to the committee of successful completion of an approved apprenticeship or tutorial program that meets NCCAOM standards shall be granted certification by the board.

The committee shall waive the requirements of subsection (a) and an applicant presenting satisfactory evidence to the committee that such applicant held a license in good standing from another state immediately prior to practicing in Tennessee and who has continually practiced in Tennessee since that time shall be granted certification by the board.

ADSs who meet the requirements listed in § 63-6-1002 shall be issued a limited acupuncture certificate.

Acts 2000, ch. 685, § 7.

63-6-1006. Renewal of certificate.

A certificate to practice acupuncture must be renewed every two (2) years. To renew a certificate, a person must submit proof of current active NCCAOM certification in acupuncture or document compliance with § 63-6-1005. To renew an ADS certificate, a person must submit proof of current active practice in auricular detoxification treatment, as determined by the committee.

Acts 2000, ch. 685, § 8.

63-6-1007. Disciplinary action.

The board, in consultation with the committee, may deny, suspend or revoke certification, require remedial education or issue a letter of reprimand, if an applicant or certified acupuncturist:

Engages in false or fraudulent conduct that demonstrates an unfitness to practice acupuncture, including:

Misrepresentation in connection with an applicant for certification or an investigation by the committee;

Attempting to collect fees for services that were not performed;

False advertising, including guaranteeing that a cure will result from an acupuncture treatment; or

Dividing or agreeing to divide a fee with anyone for referring the patient for acupuncture;

Fails to exercise proper control over one's practice by:

Delegating professional responsibilities to a person the acupuncturist knows or should know is not qualified to perform; or

Failing to exercise proper control over uncertified personnel working with the practice;

Fails to maintain records in a proper manner by:

Failing to keep written records describing the course of treatment for each patient;

Refusing to provide a patient, upon request, records that have been prepared for or paid for by the patient; or

Revealing personally identifiable information about a patient, without consent, unless otherwise authorized by law;

Fails to exercise proper care of a patient, including the exercising or attempting to exercise undue influence in the acupuncturist-patient relationship by making sexual advances or requests for sexual activity or making submission to such conduct a condition of treatment;

Displays substance abuse or mental impairment to such a degree as to interfere with the ability to provide safe and effective treatment;

Is convicted of or pleads guilty or no contest to any crime that demonstrates an unfitness to practice acupuncture;

Negligently fails to practice acupuncture with the level of skill recognized within the profession as acceptable under such circumstances;

Willfully violates any provision of this part or rule of the commission; or

Has had a certificate or license denied, suspended or revoked in another jurisdiction for any reason that would be grounds for such action in Tennessee.

Acts 2000, ch. 685, § 9.

63-6-1008. Use of needles.

All certified individuals under this part shall use only presterilized, disposable needles in their administration of acupuncture treatments. The use of staples in the practice of acupuncture is prohibited.

Health practices shall include:

Hands shall be washed with soap and water or other disinfectant before handling needles and between treatment of different patients;

Skin in the area of penetration shall be thoroughly swabbed with alcohol or other germicidal solution before inserting needles; and

Individuals shall pass a nationally recognized clean needle technique course before being allowed to practice acupuncture and related techniques.

Acts 2000, ch. 685, § 10.

63-6-1009. Fees.

The board, in consultation with the committee, shall set fees relative to the application, certification and renewal thereof in amounts sufficient to pay all of the expenses of certification and of the committee directly attributable to the performance of its duties under this part.

All deposits and disbursements shall be handled in accordance with § 63-1-137.

Acts 2000, ch. 685, § 11.

63-6-1010. Use of titles.

The titles “licensed acupuncturist” or “ADS” may be used by persons certified under this part. No person who is not properly licensed to practice medicine or osteopathy shall use certification under this part to identify such person as a doctor or physician.

Each person certified to practice acupuncture shall post the certificate in a conspicuous location at such person's place of practice.

Acts 2000, ch. 685, § 12.